Arkansas, session 2025, HB1818.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 77 is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:

Subchapter 30 — Medicaid Provider-Led Care Transparency and Accountability
Act

20-77-3001. Title
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Medicaid
Provider-Led Care Transparency and Accountability Act".

20-77-3002. Workgroup for risk-based provider organization quality and
effectiveness of care.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall create a workgroup
comprised of representatives of Medicaid beneficiaries who are enrolled with
a risk-based provider organization and providers for intellectual and
developmental disabilities and behavioral health services to help develop
appropriate standards for risk-based provider organizations to follow to
*JMB530*
03/17/2025 8:53:04 AM JMB530

HB1818
improve the quality and effectiveness of care.
(b) The workgroup described in this section may be a subcommittee of
the Medicaid Advisory Committee.

20-77-3003. Care coordination.
(a) A risk-based provider organization shall pay a direct service
provider for care coordination from the capitated rate that the Department of
Human Services pays the risk-based provider organization.
(b) A risk-based provider organization may subcontract with direct
service providers, with appropriate compensation, any care coordination
duties assigned to the risk-based provider organization as long as the
assignment does not include the federal conflict-free functions that include
eligibility evaluations, assessments of functional needs, and person-centered
care plan development.
(c) In consultation with the workgroup established under § 20-77-3002,
a risk-based provider organization shall develop enhanced education and
training for care coordinators, including behavior supports.
(d) A care coordinator of a risk-based provider organization shall
ensure that meetings for development of person-centered service plans align
with provider care plan renewal dates except when unavoidable.

20-77-3004. Gag clause prohibited.
(a) A risk-based provider organization or affiliated entity shall not
prohibit a direct service provider who is an investor in the risk-based
provider organization or an affiliated entity from taking positions or
advocating publicly on agency rules, legislation, or other matters of public
interest that conflict with the position or interests of the risk-based
provider organization.
(b) If a contract between a risk-based provider organization and a
direct service provider contains a provision that conflicts with subsection
(a) of this section, the provision of the contract is void.

20-77-3005. Quality initiatives.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall require a contracted
external quality review organization to collect data with specific quality
metrics for risk-based provider organizations aimed at improving services for
03/17/2025 8:53:04 AM JMB530

HB1818
individuals with intellectual and developmental disabilities, including
appropriate measures from the Home- and Community-Based Services Quality
Measure Set.
(b) The contracted external quality review organization shall consult
with the workgroup established under § 20-77-3002.
(c)(1) For individuals diagnosed with an intellectual or developmental
disability, the department shall require a risk-based provider organizations
to initiates services through an intellectual or developmental disability
services provider within sixty (60) days of the individual’s assignment to a
risk-based provider organization.
(2) If the risk-based provider organization does not comply with
subdivision (c)(1) of this section, the department shall impose penalties
upon the risk-based provider organization.
(d)(1) The department shall authorize the use of assistive and
enabling technology, including smart home technology, as a recognized service
delivery method for home- and community-based services.
(2) The authorization under subdivision (d)(1) of this section
shall extend to the provision of services through remote staffing models
where appropriate and in accordance with applicable rules.
(e) In consultation with the workgroup, the department shall
establish:
(1) Value-based payment initiatives for intellectual and
developmental disabilities and behavioral health providers who meet quality
of care targets;
(2) New evidence-based treatment services to aid high-utilizing
members assessed with behavioral health needs to access appropriate care; and
(3) A non-medical transportation billing code or modifier for
use under supported employment categories separate from transportation under
supported living categories.
(f) In recognition of the higher intensity of services required by
individuals with complex conditions in the Community Support System Provider
Program, a risk-based provider organization shall determine appropriate
direct service provider rates for services required by individuals with
complex conditions in the Community Support System Provider Program rather
than defaulting to supported living category rates.

03/17/2025 8:53:04 AM JMB530

HB1818
20-77-3006. Credentialing.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall require the risk-based
provider organizations to standardize credentialing across all risk-based
provider organizations.
(b)(1) A risk-based provider organization shall obtain credentialing
information on therapists, including speech-language therapists, physical
therapists, occupational therapists, and board-certified behavior analysists,
through the Medicaid portal where providers enter credentialing information.
(2) If additional information is required, a risk-based provider
organization shall use the Council for Affordable Quality Healthcare National
Database to obtain the additional information.

20-77-3007. Audit fairness.
(a) The Department of Human Services, risk-based provider
organizations, and contracted entities conducting audits of providers shall
establish secure online portals for providers to submit information and may
not make duplicate requests.
(b) Until the portal is established or if the portal is down, a risk-
based provider organization shall cover the provider’s reasonable costs of
copying records at no less than twenty cents ($0.20) per page, plus postage
and shipping costs.
(c) A risk-based provider organization shall:
(1) Make no more than two (2) audit requests per calendar year
from a direct service provider unless a complaint has been lodged or there is
reasonable suspicion of fraud or abuse;
(2) Allow a provider at least sixty (60) days to supply records
requested by the risk-based provider organization, except in an emergency;
and
(3) Allow a provider at least sixty (60) days following receipt
of the preliminary audit report in which to produce documentation to address
any discrepancy found during the audit.
(d) The period covered by an audit shall not exceed twelve (12) months
from the date the claim was submitted to a risk-based provider organization.
(e) The Medicaid Fairness Act, § 20-77-1701 et seq., shall continue to
apply to the risk-based provider organizations.

03/17/2025 8:53:04 AM JMB530

HB1818
20-77-3008. Transparency and reporting.
(a)(1)(A) Annually on or before March 1, a risk-based provider
organization shall file with the Department of Human Services a full and true
statement of the financial condition, transactions, and affairs of the risk-
based provider organization as of December 31 of the preceding year.
(B) The department may grant an extension of time to file
the statement required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section for good
cause if a written application for an extension of time is received at least
five (5) business days before the filing due date.
(2) The statement required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this
section shall:
(A) Be prepared according to the companion National
Association of Insurance Commissioners’ Annual and Quarterly Statement
Instructions and follow those accounting principles and procedures prescribed
by the companion National Association of Insurance Commissioners’ Accounting
Practices and Procedures Manual; and
(B) Include the following information of the risk-based
provider organization:
(A) Total assets;
(B) Total liabilities;
(C) Total reserves;
(D) Net premium income;
(E) Total claims paid;
(F) Total claims denied;
(G) Payments to or from the state under a risk
corridor;
(H) The amount paid by the Arkansas Medicaid Program
to the risk-based provider organization for the previous period of January 1
through December 31;
(I) The amount that the risk-based provider
organization paid to in-network providers from the previous period of January
1 through December 31;
(J) The amount that the risk-based provider
organization paid to out-of-network providers from the previous period of
January 1 through December 31;
(K) A list of any underwriting, auditing, actuarial,
03/17/2025 8:53:04 AM JMB530

HB1818
financial analysis, treasury, and investment expenses;
(L) A list of any marketing and sales expenses,
including without limitation advertising, member relations, member
enrollment, and all expenses associated with producers, brokers, and benefit
consultants;
(M) A list of any claims operations expenses,
including without limitation expenses for adjudication, appeals, settlements,
and expenses associated with paying claims;
(N) A list of any medical administration expenses,
including without limitation disease management, utilization review, and
medical management;
(O) A list of any network operations expenses,
including without limitation expenses for contracting, hospital and physician
relations, and medical policy procedures;
(P) A list of any charitable expenses, including
without limitation contributions to tax-exempt foundations and community
benefits;
(Q) The amount of state insurance premium taxes
paid;
(R) The fees related to depreciation;
(S) A list of miscellaneous expenses described in
detail by expense, including any expense not previously included in this
section; and
(T) Any other information required by the
department.
(b) A risk-based provider organizations shall file an executive
summary of the statement required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section
with:
(1) The House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;
and
(2) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.
(c) Annually, between thirty (30) and sixty (60) days before the
initial date of open enrollment in a risk-based provider organization, a
risk-based provider organization shall prominently display on its website the
report required under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section and the executive
summary of the report required under subdivision (b) of this section.
03/17/2025 8:53:04 AM JMB530

HB1818

20-77-3009. Legislative oversight.
(a) Before submitting the quarterly reports required under § 20-77-
2707 to the Legislative Council, the Department of Human Services shall
submit the quarterly reports required under § 20-77-2707 for review to:
(1) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor;
and
(2) The House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor.
(b) The Senate Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor and the
House Committee on Public Health, Welfare, and Labor shall jointly provide
ongoing oversight of the Medicaid Provider-Led Organized Care Act, § 20-77-
2701 et seq.
(c)(1) The department shall commission an annual actuarial report
concerning rate setting for risk-based provider organizations that addresses
the projected costs and necessary rates for direct service providers as part
of the capitated rate development to the same extent as the annual actuarial
report addresses costs and other allowances for the risk-based provider
organizations.
(2) The Legislative Council, or the Joint Budget Committee if
the General Assembly is in session, shall favorably review the annual
actuarial report under subdivision (c)(1) of this section before submission
to the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services.

20-77-3010. Private right of action.
An enrollee or direct service provider may file suit for equitable
relief against the Department of Human Services or a risk-based provider
organization in a court of competent jurisdiction and is entitled to collect
reasonable attorneys’ fees and costs.

20-77-3010. Rules.
The Department of Human Services may promulgate rules to implement this
subchapter.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. SEVERABILITY CLAUSE. If any provision of
this act or the application of this act to any person or circumstance is held
invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of
03/17/2025 8:53:04 AM JMB530

HB1818
this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or
application, and to this end, the provisions of this act are declared
severable.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. TEMPORARY LANGUAGE. Implementation of this
act.
(a) The requirements in § 20-77-3004(a) shall begin on January 1,
2026.
(b) Within sixty (60) days of the effective date of this subchapter,
the department shall submit all required applications, amendments, and
supporting documentation to the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services for
approval to ensure compliance with federal requirements and facilitate the
implementation of these service delivery methods, including without
limitation:
(1) An amendment to the state Medicaid plan; and
(2) Any necessary modifications to existing waiver programs.
(c) The initial standardization of credentialing under § 20-77-3007(a)
shall occur within three (3) months of the effective date of this act.


















03/17/2025 8:53:04 AM JMB530